Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-685
Order or decision; appeal by affected person.

Any affected person aggrieved by any order issued or final decision made by the Chief Water Officer pursuant to the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act may appeal the order to the Court of Appeals. For purposes of this section, affected person means the applicant for a permit which is the subject of the Chief Water Officer's order or final decision and any owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land or water whose interest is or may be impacted in a direct and significant manner by the Chief Water Officer's order or final decision.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 80;

Laws 2001, LB 129, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 199.